Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-228
Department of Correctional Services; convey described property.

The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to sell and convey by quitclaim deed a tract of land located in the northwest quarter of the southwest quarter of section four, township eight north, range sixteen west of the sixth principal meridian, Buffalo County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows: Referring to the northwest corner of said southwest quarter; thence easterly on the north line of said southwest quarter a distance of two hundred sixty-four feet to the actual place of beginning; thence continuing easterly on the aforesaid north line a distance of three hundred eighty-eight and eighty-eight hundredths feet to a four-inch iron pipe; thence southerly a distance of eighty-five and thirty-nine hundredths feet to a point on the north line of the existing public road; thence westerly on a six hundred eighty-seven and thirty-one hundredths radius curve and on the aforesaid north line a distance of sixty-two and two hundredths feet to the point of tangency, said point being right eighty-five degrees fifty minutes fifty-three seconds from the east line of said tract and a chord distance of sixty-two feet from the last described point; thence tangent a distance of one hundred thirty-eight and four-tenths feet to the point of curvature; thence on a one thousand six hundred seven and sixty-one hundredths foot radius curve to the right forming a central angle of five degrees thirty-five minutes zero seconds a distance of one hundred fifty-six and sixty-six hundredths feet to the point of tangency; thence tangent a distance of thirty-two and twelve hundredths feet to a point, said point being two hundred sixty-four feet east of the west line of said southwest quarter; thence northerly and parallel to the aforesaid west line a distance of seventy-seven and eighty-seven hundredths feet to the place of beginning; containing seventy-seven hundredths acres, more or less.

Laws 1983, LB 522, § 1.